Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1211
Licensee; examination; cost; payment.

The secretary may examine without notice the condition and affairs of each licensee. In connection with any examination, the secretary may examine on oath any licensee, and any director, officer, employee, customer, creditor or stockholder of a licensee concerning the affairs and business of the licensee. The secretary shall ascertain whether the licensee transacts its business in the manner prescribed by law and the rules and regulations issued thereunder. The licensee shall pay the actual cost of the examination as determined by the secretary, which fee shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the General Fund. Failure to pay the examination fee within thirty days of receipt of demand from the secretary shall automatically suspend the license until the fee is paid.

In the investigation of alleged violations of sections 69-1201 to 69-1217, the secretary may compel the attendance of any person or the production of any books, accounts, records and files used therein, and may examine under oath all persons in attendance pursuant thereto.

Laws 1967, c. 377, § 11, p. 1183.